Maryland, session 2026, SB0825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 446 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 14. CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE.
14–1401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BRANCH” MEANS THE CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROTECTION
BRANCH.
(C) “CENTER” MEANS THE MARYLAND COORDINATION AND ANALYSIS
CENTER.
(D) (1) “CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE” MEANS ASSETS, SYSTEMS, AND
NETWORKS, WHETHER PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL, CONSIDERED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY TO BE SO VITAL TO THE UNITED STATES
THAT THEIR INCAPACITATION OR DESTRUCTION WOULD HAVE A DEBILITATING
EFFECT ON ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) SECURITY;
(II) NATIONAL ECONOMIC SECURITY;
(III) NATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH; OR
(IV) SAFETY.
(2) “CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE” INCLUDES A HOSPITAL OR
HEALTH CARE FACILITY.
(E) “EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR” MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
MARYLAND COORDINATION AND ANALYSIS CENTER.
14–1402.
THERE IS A CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROTECTION BRANCH IN THE
MARYLAND COORDINATION AND ANALYSIS CENTER.
14–1403.
(A) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL APPOINT A CHIEF CRITICAL
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 446
INFRASTRUCTURE OFFICER FOR THE BRANCH.
(B) THE CHIEF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE OFFICER SHALL:
(1) ADMINISTER AND OPERATE THE BRANCH, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) DIRECT CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE SECURITY EFFORTS ACROSS
THE STATE;
(4) COORDINATE WITH:
(I) THE DIRECTOR OF THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF
HOMELAND SECURITY;
(II) CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE INDUSTRY, LOCAL, AND
FEDERAL COUNTERPART ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(III) THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY;
(IV) THE NATIONAL GUARD; AND
(V) OTHER KEY STAKEHOLDERS IDENTIFIED BY THE CHIEF
CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE OFFICER; AND
(5) (I) ENGAGE WITH CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDERS ON
VOLUNTARY CYBER AND PHYSICAL ASSESSMENTS; AND
(II) PROVIDE CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDERS WITH
BEST PRACTICES FOR SECURITY AND THE RESULTS OF VOLUNTARY ASSESSMENTS;
AND
(6) ADVISE THE GOVERNOR AND THE DIRECTOR OF THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY ON CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE
SECURITY ISSUES.
14–1404.
(A) THE BRANCH SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY CURRENT AND POTENTIAL THREATS TO THE STATE’S
– 3 –

Ch. 446 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE;
(2) PRIORITIZE THE STATE’S CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE ASSETS BY:
(I) IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, THE OFFICE OF SECURITY MANAGEMENT, AND THE
PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, DETERMINING THE THREAT LEVEL TO THE STATE’S
CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, FOCUSING ON FOREIGN ACTORS, DOMESTIC ACTORS,
AND INSIDER THREATS;
(II) DETERMINING THE IMPACTS TO THE STATE’S CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE IN THE CASE OF A CYBERSECURITY OR PHYSICAL ATTACK;
(III) UNDERSTANDING THE EFFECT THAT THE COMPROMISE OF
ONE ASPECT OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE MAY HAVE ON ANOTHER ASPECT OF
CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE;
(IV) ENGAGING AND COORDINATING WITH CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE SECTOR LEADERS, MILITARY LEADERS, AND OTHER RELEVANT
STAKEHOLDERS;
(V) IDENTIFYING THE STATE’S CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE
OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS; AND
(VI) STRENGTHENING SUPPORTING THE STATE’S CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE PRIORITY ASSETS BY:
1. CONNECTING PRIORITY ASSETS TO RESOURCES FOR
CONDUCTING INTEGRATED ASSESSMENTS OF THE STATE’S CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE TO DETECT AND DOCUMENT VULNERABILITIES AND
OPERATIONAL DEPENDENCIES;
2. SUPPORTING IDENTIFYING TECHNICAL AND GRANT
OPPORTUNITIES TO SUPPORT REMEDIATION OF IDENTIFIED VULNERABILITIES; AND
3. ASSISTING IN THE COMPLETION OF VULNERABILITY
REMEDIATION; AND ESTABLISHING MECHANISMS TO SUPPORT SHARED LEARNING
AND BEST PRACTICES BETWEEN DIFFERENT CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE ASSETS.
4. IMPLEMENTING OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY
ARCHITECTURE MONITORING THROUGH THE MARYLAND INFORMATION SHARING
AND ANALYSIS CENTER.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 446
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE CENTER, SHALL COORDINATE CONSEQUENCE MANAGEMENT EFFORTS
AND RESPOND TO CASCADING IMPACTS OF AN ATTACK ON THE STATE’S CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE CENTER, SHALL:
(1) ALLOW THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE TO BECOME A MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND INFORMATION
SHARING AND ANALYSIS CENTER; AND
(2) PROVIDE UP–TO–DATE CYBERSECURITY REPORTING STANDARDS
TO AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(3) DIRECT CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE CYBERSECURITY EFFORTS
ACROSS THE UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to supersede, abrogate, modify, limit,
or otherwise affect any cybersecurity regulation, requirement, or authority that is currently
in effect and that applies to critical infrastructure entities that are under federal, State, or
sector–specific regulatory frameworks..
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –